skt_gen/Sentence/UNKN_PDGM/unknwn_sup.dix
<pardef n="/uR__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRI</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UmRi</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRI</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UmRi</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRA</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urByAm</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urBiH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRe</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urByAm</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urByaH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRaH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urByAm</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>urByaH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRaH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRoH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRAm</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRi</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRoH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uHRu</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uRI</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>UmRi</l><r>uR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="/iR__nm">
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRI</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ImRi</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:1"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRI</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ImRi</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:2"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRA</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>rByAm</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>rBiH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:3"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRe</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>irByAm</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>irByaH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:4"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRaH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>irByAm</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>irByaH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:5"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRaH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRoH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRAm</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:6"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRi</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRoH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uHRu</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:7"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>

<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>uH</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:eka"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>iRI</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:xvi"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
<e><re>[a-zA-Z]*</re>
<p><l>ImRi</l><r>iR<s n="vargaH:nA"/><s n="lifgam:napuM"/><s n="viBakwiH:8"/><s n="vacanam:bahu"/><s n="level:1"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/iR__nm"/></e>
    <e lm="" r="RL"><i></i><par n="/uR__nm"/></e>
